District of Columbia statutes.
42-1904.01

Exemptions.

Unless the method of offer or disposition is adopted for the purpose of evasion of this chapter, the provisions of §§ 42-1904.02, 42-1904.03, 42-1904.04, 42-1904.05, 42-1904.06, 42-1904.07, 42-1904.08, 42-1904.09, and 42-1904.12 do not apply to:

(1)

Dispositions in a condominium in which all units are restricted to commercial, industrial, or other nonresidential use;

(2)

Dispositions pursuant to court order;

(3)

Dispositions by any government or government agency;

(4)

Solicitation and acquisition by the declarant of nonbinding reservation agreements;

(5)

Gratuitous dispositions; or

(6)

Dispositions by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title IV, § 401, 23 DCR 9532b
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-233, § 2(pp), 38 DCR 261

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-1901.01 and § 42-1904.11.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1861.
1973 Ed., § 5-1261.